Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2236
Community college area; annual report.

Each community
college area shall annually report such data as necessary to carry out the
Community College Aid Act to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education.

Laws 2012, LB946, § 6.